Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 2. Funds Consolidation
§ 9-4-208.
Refunds.

Except as provided by W.S. 9-4-204(t)(iii)(D) and 9-4-206(c) and (d), money paid into the state treasury through error or under circumstances such that the state is not legally entitled to retain it, may be refunded upon the submission of a verified claim therefor. The claimant shall present his verified claim, together with a complete statement of facts and reasons for which the refund is claimed, to the head of the state agency concerned, who shall forthwith examine it, attach his approval or disapproval of the claim and his reasons, and submit the claim to the state auditor for settlement in the manner provided by law. At the discretion of the head of the state agency concerned, the verified claim of the claimant may be waived, and the refund made upon certification by the head of the state agency concerned.

There is appropriated to the person or entity entitled to a refund under this section, from the fund or account in the state treasury to which the money was credited, an amount sufficient to make the refund and payment.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-557.8; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-508; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “W.S. 9-4-204(t)(iii)(D)” for “W.S. 9-4-204(e).”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-4-209.
Governor's emergency expenditures. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-557.9; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-509; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; repealed by 2021 ch. 124, § 3, effective April 6, 2021.

§§ 9-4-210 and 9-4-211.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1975, ch. 245, § 1, pertained to the consolidation of existing funds as stated in W.S. 1957 9-557.4 contained in chapter 245, section 1, 1973 Session Laws and W.S. 1957 9-557.10(b) through (m) contained in chapter 16, section 1, 1974 Session Laws, and the applicability of the Wyoming Funds Consolidation Act to all state funds.

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 9-4-212.
Creation of new funds; references to word “fund”; discontinuance of existing funds.

Direct or indirect references to the word “fund” when used to identify a separate accounting entity wherever contained in the Wyoming statutes shall be construed to mean account unless the fund is established by statute. No existing statutory fund shall be discontinued or abolished without the approval of the legislature.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-557.7; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-557.12; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-512; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1993, ch. 225, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted the former first sentence, which read: “New funds may be created only by amendment to this act and as specifically authorized by law as part of a plan to implement the use of generally accepted accounting principles in state accounting,” deleted “fund” before “account,” and substituted “established by statute” for “established or permitted by this act.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-4-213.
Earned federal money.

All earned federal money received by a state department or institution shall be credited to the fund or account out of which the department, agency or institution made the expenditure resulting in the earned federal money.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-557.8; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-557.13; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-513; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-4-214.
Control and budgetary accounts; uniform accounting systems.

The state auditor shall establish general control accounts for each fund appropriation included in legislative appropriation acts to reflect the amount of expenditure approved charging against each type of fund the expenditures as made to disclose the unexpended authorizations. The state budget department shall establish budgetary accounts as necessary. The state auditor, state treasurer and the state budget department shall develop and maintain the state’s uniform centralized accounting system and methods for identifying, classifying and reporting revenues, receipts and disbursements including accounts and subaccounts for all nonappropriated state funds and shall develop and implement a uniform modified accrual accounting system.

For purposes of this section, “disbursements” does not include payments made for investments by the Wyoming retirement system, its agents or its trustees in connection with portfolio changes, provided any such payments shall be accounted for by the Wyoming retirement board, not less than monthly, in a manner acceptable to the state auditor and the state treasurer.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-557.9; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-557.14; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-514; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 7, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

in the second sentence of (a), added "state budget" preceding "department," deleted "of administration and information" preceding "shall establish," and in the third sentence, added "state budget" preceding "department," deleted "of administration and information" preceding "shall develop."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

§ 9-4-215.
University's fund structure and accounting.

The fund structure and accounting of the University of Wyoming are excluded from the operation of this act except insofar as specific disposition is made of funds utilized by the university.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-557.15; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-515; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-4-203(a)(xiii).

University of Wyoming fund. —

Section 6, ch. 16, Laws 1974, reads: “The ‘University of Wyoming Fund’ is created for the support and maintenance of the university of Wyoming and shall be used to account for all money deposited by the trustees of the university and any interest accruing thereto. Money may be disbursed and expended from the fund as provided by section 9-561 [now §

9-4-304

] of the statutes.”

§ 9-4-216.
Financial advisory council. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-557.16; Laws 1975, ch. 71, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-516; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; ch. 174, § 1; ch. 240, § 1; 2020 ch. 115, § 2, effective March 17, 2020; repealed by 2021 ch. 59, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 9-4-217.
Uniform state accounting system; uniform statewide payment processing.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the legislative, the judiciary and each executive branch agency as defined by W.S. 9-2-1002(a)(i), including the University of Wyoming, the game and fish department and the Wyoming department of transportation, shall use the uniform state accounting system designated by the state auditor.

All state agencies are required to use the uniform state accounting system to account for all revenue, budget and expenditure transactions. Procedures for the use of this system shall be prescribed by the state auditor.

The state auditor shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section.

The state auditor shall prescribe what accounts shall be kept by each state agency in addition to the uniform state accounting system maintained in the state auditor’s office. In prescribing what accounts shall be kept by each state agency, the state auditor shall take care that there shall be no unnecessary duplication.

The state auditor, with assistance from the department of audit, the state budget department, and the state treasurer shall prescribe such internal control procedures for any state agency as he deems necessary to assure assets are properly safeguarded, accounting entries are accurate and reliable, and assets and resources are being utilized consistent with the requirements of the law and duly established managerial policies in an effective, economical and efficient manner.

and (g) Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 22, § 2.

The department of enterprise technology services shall contract with a payment processor for uniform statewide payment processing services that each agency shall utilize, except as specifically prohibited by law or as otherwise provided in this subsection, to allow any tax, assessment, license, permit, fee, fine, or other money owing to the state or collectible by the state on behalf of another unit of government to be paid by negotiable paper, or in payment of any bail deposit or other trust deposit. The statewide payment processor contract shall establish a uniform rate or uniform fee for the costs of processing payment transactions for all agencies. If the administrative head of a division within an agency determines that it is not feasible to utilize the statewide payment processor contract, the administrative head may request a waiver from the state chief information officer. If the waiver is granted, the agency may, except as otherwise prohibited by law, contract with a payment processor for the purposes specified in this subsection and as reasonably limited by the waiver. The University of Wyoming, Wyoming community colleges and the judicial and legislative departments of state government may, except as otherwise prohibited by law, contract with a payment processor or utilize the statewide payment processor contract for the purposes specified in this subsection. The acceptance of negotiable paper by the state or any of its agencies under this subsection shall be in accordance with and subject to the same terms and conditions provided by W.S.

18-3-505

. Any fees assessed for processing a payment under this subsection shall be borne by the person tendering payment. Any fees borne by the person tendering payment pursuant to this subsection shall only be used by the collecting agency to pay the processing costs of rendering the payment transaction. The collecting agency shall clearly and conspicuously disclose any debit or credit card fees assessed for processing payment transactions under this subsection at the time the fees are collected, which shall include disclosure on any website used by the agency to accept payments. As used in this subsection:

“Agency” means as defined by W.S. 9-2-1002(a)(i);

“Negotiable paper” means money orders, paper arising from the use of a lender credit card as defined in W.S. 40-14-140(a)(ix), checks and drafts, including, without limitation, sales drafts and checks and drafts signed by a holder of a lender credit card issued by a bank maintaining a revolving loan account as defined in W.S.

40-14-308

, for lender credit card holders.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 238, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1992, ch. 41, § 1; 1993, ch. 36, § 1; 1998, ch. 84, § 1; 1999, ch. 22, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 21, § 1; 2019 ch. 146, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 48, § 1, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the last sentence in (h).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, deleted the last sentence, which read: "The rules and regulations may include the selection of a credit processor to provide credit card services to the entities enumerated in subsection (a) of this section"; and in (h), substituted "The department of enterprise technology services shall contract with a payment processor for statewide payment processing services that each executive" for "Unless specifically prohibited by statute, any legislative, judicial or executive," "including the game and fish" for "including the University of Wyoming, the game and fish," "shall utilize, except as specifically prohibited by law or as otherwise provided in this subsection, to allow" for "may contract with a credit card processor and allow," added the second, third, and fourth sentences, substituted "`negotiable paper'" for "negotiable paper," "processing a payment under this subsection" for "processing a credit card payment," and "payment transaction" for "credit card transaction."

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 48. § 1, added "; uniform statewide payment processing" in the section heading; and rewrote (h), which read, "The department of enterprise technology services shall contract with a payment processor for statewide payment processing services that each executive branch agency as defined by W.S. 9-2-1002(a)(i), including the game and fish department and the Wyoming department of transportation, shall utilize, except as specifically prohibited by law or as otherwise provided in this subsection, to allow any tax, assessment, license, permit, fee, fine, or other money owing to the state or collectible by the state on behalf of another unit of government to be paid by negotiable paper, or in payment of any bail deposit or other trust deposit. If the administrative head of a division within a department determines that it is not feasible to utilize the statewide payment processor contract the administrative head shall request a waiver from the state chief information officer. If the waiver is granted, the division may, except as otherwise prohibited by law, contract with a payment processor for the purposes specified in this subsection and as reasonably limited by the waiver. The University of Wyoming, Wyoming community colleges and the judicial and legislative departments of state government may, except as otherwise prohibited by law, contract with a payment processor or utilize the statewide payment processor contract for the purposes specified in this subsection. As used in this subsection, “negotiable paper” means money orders, paper arising from the use of a lender credit card as defined in W.S. 40-14-140(a)(ix), checks and drafts, including, without limitation, sales drafts and checks and drafts signed by a holder of a lender credit card issued by a bank maintaining a revolving loan account as defined in W.S.

40-14-308

, for lender credit card holders. The acceptance of negotiable paper by the state or any of its agencies under this subsection shall be in accordance with and subject to the same terms and conditions provided by W.S.

18-3-505

. Any fees assessed for processing a payment under this subsection may be borne by the agency or person tendering payment. Any fees borne by the person tendering payment pursuant to this subsection may be used by the state auditor or the agency responsible for the collection of such fees to pay the processing costs of rendering the payment transaction."

Laws 2021, ch. 48, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 56, § 3, deleted "; uniform statewide payment processing" in the section heading; in (e), added "state" preceding "budget," deleted "division of the" preceding "department" and "of administration and information" preceding "and the state treasurer."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

§ 9-4-218.
Federal natural resource policy account created; purposes.

There is created an account known as the “federal natural resource policy account.” Funds within the account may be expended by the governor on behalf of the state of Wyoming and its local governments, to take any of the actions specified in this subsection related to federal land, water, air, mineral and other natural resource policies which may affect the tax base of the state, wildlife management, state species, recreation, private property rights, water rights or leasehold rights. Funds also may be expended for preparing and participating in environmental impact statements and environmental assessments, including analysis of economic or social and natural or physical environmental effects on the human environment. Funds also may be expended for coordinating and participating in rangeland health assessments pursuant to W.S.

11-2-207

. The governor may expend funds from the federal natural resource policy account for:

Participation of the state, a state agency or a county as a joint lead agency to prepare an environmental impact statement in accordance with regulations promulgated by the federal council on environmental quality;

Participation of the state, a state agency or a county as a cooperating agency in accordance with regulations promulgated by the federal council on environmental quality. Participation may include:

Involvement in the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) process at the earliest possible time;

Involvement in the scoping process described in regulations promulgated by the federal council on environmental quality;

Development of information and preparation of environmental analyses including portions of the environmental impact statement in which Wyoming has special expertise;

Assisting the state, a state agency or counties in collecting, compiling, analyzing and distributing economic impact data related to federal natural resource policy formation and participation in policy development;

Making staff support available at the lead agency’s request to enhance Wyoming’s interdisciplinary capability; and

Expenditure of state or county funds.

Investigating, initiating, intervening or otherwise participating in litigation, or taking any other legal action by the state, a state agency or the counties of the state individually or jointly, that furthers the purposes of this subsection. In carrying out this subsection, the attorney general or the counties, with approval of the governor, may retain qualified practicing attorneys to act for the state or the counties, including providing representation in other forums with the federal government or other state or county governments that may preclude or resolve any outstanding issues or attempting to influence pertinent federal legislation;

Participation in monitoring of federal natural resource issues, including the collection, review, analysis or dissemination of any material that may be required for legal action or to support any other purpose authorized under this section;

Training seminars educating state and local government officials and employees on the provisions and requirements of the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 and related federal rules and regulations, and on the processes used by federal agencies in administering federal law;

Development of rangeland health assessments in compliance with W.S.

11-2-207

;

Participation in the formulation, preparation and implementation of environmental impact statements and associated records of decision and other federal management decisions;

Development and revision of comprehensive natural resource management plans prepared by counties. Plans funded pursuant to this paragraph shall:

Identify objectives and priorities for the use, development and protection of natural resources and land in Wyoming;

Be based on criteria established by the governor’s office in consultation with the counties and consistently applied in each comprehensive natural resource management plan;

Serve as a basis for communicating and coordinating with the federal government and its agencies on land and natural resource management issues;

Be developed or revised in public meetings held in accordance with W.S.

16-4-401

through

16-4-408

. The public meetings shall allow for participation and contribution from the public.

All funds including any recovered court costs and earned interest remaining in the federal natural resource policy account at the end of a biennium shall remain in the account to implement the purposes of this section.

In the expenditure of funds from the federal natural resources policy account pursuant to this section, preference shall be given to those funding requests that:

Enhance the ability of a county to participate in federal natural resource policy matters;

Fund actions taken under paragraph (a)(iii) of this section as the governor determines necessary or advisable to protect or promote the state’s jurisdictional, economic or property interests which may be affected by actions taken by the environmental protection agency or other federal agencies;

Fund actions taken under subsection (a) of this section as the governor determines necessary or advisable to facilitate federal permitting of proposed activities which may bring about further economic development of the natural resources of the state; or

Add to the internal expertise of the state or a state agency to participate in federal natural resource policy matters.

The governor shall report in the governor’s office budget request submitted pursuant to W.S.

9-2-1013

:

All actions taken pursuant to this section;

All expenditures from the federal natural resource policy account in each of the immediately preceding two (2) fiscal years;

The purpose of each expenditure.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 171, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 1; 2003, ch. 166, § 1; 2004, ch. 81, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 401; ch. 91, § 1; ch. 107, § 2; 2011, ch. 141, § 1; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2014 ch. 94, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 127, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 39, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (a)(v).

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), in the first sentence, deleted “within the special revenue fund” following “There is created.”

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, by ch. 69, § 401, effective July 1, 2010, added (d).

The second 2010 amendment, by ch. 91, § 1, effective July 1, 2010, in (a), added (a)(ii)(D), redesignated former (a)(ii)(D) and (a)(ii)(E) as (a)(ii)(E) and (a)(ii)(F), and added (a)(vii); and added (c).

The third 2010 amendment, by ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2010, in (a), added the present third sentence in the introductory language, and added (a)(vi).

No amendment gave effect to the others and this section is set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2011 amendment,

in (a)(iii), added “by the state, a state agency or the counties of the state individually or jointly” in the first sentence, and added “or the counties” or variants.

Laws 2011, ch. 141, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2014 amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, by ch. 7, §
2, effective July 1, 2014, in the introductory paragraph of (d), substituted “in the governor's office budget request submitted pursuant to W.S.

9-2-1013

” for “to the joint appropriations interim committee not later than December 1, of each year”; and in (d)(ii), added “in each of the immediately preceding two (2) fiscal years.”

The second 2014 amendment, by ch. 94, §
2, in (c), inserted the former “Enhance the ability of a county to participate in federal natural resource policy matters” in the present (i) and added (ii).

Laws 2014, ch. 94, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (c)(ii) added “or promote” following “to protect,” substituted “which may be affected by” for “from”, and added “or other federal agencies”; added (c)(iii) and (c)(iv); and made related changes.

The 2019 amendment

substituted "related" for "in response" preceding "to federal land"iii in (a) and added (a)(viii).

Laws 2019, ch. 39, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2019.

Purpose of act. —

Laws 1999, ch. 171, § 2, provides: “The Wyoming legislature recognizes the impact made on Wyoming custom, culture, economy and the management of natural resources within Wyoming by proposed federal natural resource management policies. The Wyoming legislature desires to coordinate, cooperate and communicate with the federal government and, if necessary, challenge federal natural resource management policies which are implemented or advanced in contravention of decisions made by the United States congress or are contrary to the best interests of the state of Wyoming, its local governments and the property rights of its citizens.”

Annual report. —

Laws 1999, ch. 171, § 4, requires the governor to report to the joint appropriations interim committee no later than December 1 of each year on: 1) all actions taken pursuant to this section, 2) all expenditures from the federal natural resource policy account, and 3) the purpose of each expenditure.

Federal references. —

The National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 is codified at 42 U.S.C.S. 4321 et seq.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2011, ch. 141, § 3, provides: “There is appropriated two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00) from the general fund to the federal natural resource policy account to be expended only as provided in section 2 of this act. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2012. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2012.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2003, ch. 166, § 2, provides:

“(a)

The attorney general may investigate potential litigation against the federal government of the United States for the reasons provided in this section or, in the alternative, may initiate litigation, file an amicus curiae brief or intervene as provided by state or federal law in any existing lawsuit concerning essentially the same issues. When considering to initiate or intervene in litigation, the attorney general shall give precedence to lawsuits whose venue is within Wyoming, but may act in lawsuits filed anywhere in the United States. The attorney general may retain by contract private qualified practicing attorneys to represent the state of Wyoming as provided by W.S. 9-4-218(a).

“(b)

All costs of the investigation or litigation shall be provided from the federal natural resource policy account pursuant to W.S.

9-4-218

, but nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit the state, through the attorney general or a private attorney representing the state under contract, from seeking reasonable costs and attorney's fees from any responding party in litigation.

“(c)

The investigation or litigation initiated by the attorney general under this section shall include determination of whether the state of Wyoming is entitled to damages or other relief as provided by state or federal laws or rules or regulations as a result of the introduction of gray wolves as an experimental, nonessential population into the boundaries of this state, and further to determine whether protection, proposed or otherwise, of other species within the boundaries of this state entitles the state of Wyoming to damages or other relief. The attorney general is authorized to take any legal action to pursue other claims against the federal government that may arise in the course of preparing the efforts authorized by this act.

“(d)

In addition to all other legal remedies that are provided by law, the attorney general shall seek reimbursement to the state of Wyoming for the cost of operating all state species management programs that have been or will be required by the federal government, but for which no adequate funding has been provided to the state of Wyoming.

“(e)

The attorney general shall:

“(i)

Monitor and identify monetary compensation received from federal agencies under W.S.

9-4-218

and this section;

“(ii)

In cooperation with other relevant state agencies, determine the benefits accrued to the state from actions undertaken pursuant to W.S.

9-4-218

and this section;

“(iii)

On or before January 1, 2004, report to the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee and the joint appropriations committee on duties assigned under paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection.”

§ 9-4-219.
Legislative stabilization reserve account created; purposes; legislative deficit control account.

The legislative stabilization reserve account created by 2005 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 191, Section 4, Section 301(d) is continued and codified. Funds within the account shall only be expended by legislative appropriation. All funds within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d), (e) and (q) and all investment earnings from the account shall be credited to the general fund.

To the extent funds are available after all other appropriations or transfers from the legislative stabilization reserve account to be made on or prior to June 30 of the applicable fiscal year have been made, an amount necessary to restore the unobligated, unencumbered balance within the public school foundation program account to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00) on June 30 of each fiscal year shall be transferred from the legislative stabilization reserve account into the public school foundation program account. This subsection is repealed the month immediately following the date that the state auditor and the state treasurer first certify to the governor and the department of revenue, and the governor certifies the same to the secretary of state, that the unobligated, unencumbered balance in the legislative stabilization reserve account is less than five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000.00).

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 144, § 3.

History.

2015 ch. 195, § 1, effective March 10, 2015; 2017 ch. 205, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 38, § 1, effective February 15, 2019; 2019 ch. 201, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 144, § 3, effective April 12, 2021.

The 2017 amendment

, added the designation (a) and added (b).

Laws 2017, ch. 205, § 9, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2017.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 38, § 1, inserted “as authorized under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d), (e) and (q)” in the third sentence of (a).

Laws 2019, ch. 38, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2019.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 201, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, added (c).

The 2021 amendment

repealed (c), which read, "There is created the legislative deficit control account within the legislative stabilization reserve account. Funds within the account shall only be expended by legislative appropriation. All funds within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e) and all investment earnings from the account shall be credited to the general fund. W.S. 9-4-715(q) shall not apply to the investment of this account. For purposes of accounting and investing only, the legislative deficit control account shall be treated as a separate account from the legislative stabilization reserve account."

Laws 2021, ch. 144, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 12, 2021.

§ 9-4-220.
Strategic investments and projects account created; purposes.

The strategic investments and projects account created by 2013 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 73, Section 4, Section 300(e) is continued and codified. Funds within the account shall only be expended by legislative appropriation. Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the governor may include appropriation requests from funds available within the strategic investments and projects account within his biennial budget requests for one–time expenditures as he deems necessary. All funds within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer and all investment earnings from the account shall be credited to the general fund, except as provided by W.S.

9-4-220

.1(a).

For fiscal year 2021 and in each fiscal year thereafter unencumbered and unobligated funds available for expenditure in the strategic investments and projects account shall be expended for the following purposes and subject to the following:

An amount equal to forty–five percent (45%) of the maximum amount which may be credited to the strategic investments and projects account pursuant to W.S. 9-4-719(q) shall be credited to a school major maintenance subaccount. Funds within the subaccount shall be expended only for school major maintenance obligations of the state. For purposes of accounting and investing only, the school major maintenance subaccount shall be treated as a separate account from the strategic investments and projects account;

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 144, § 3.

History.

2015 ch. 195, § 1, effective March 10, 2015; 2018 ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 136, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 201, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 144, § 3, effective April 12, 2021.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, added “except as provided by W.S.

9-4-220

.1(a)” at the end.

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 136, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, in (a), added “Subject to subsection (b) of this section” at the beginning of the third sentence; and added (b).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(ii), added "After making transfers to the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction account under W.S.

9-4-220

.1, on June 30, 2021 for fiscal year 2021 and June 30 of each fiscal year thereafter sixty-five percent (65%) of the" at the beginning, and substituted "subsection shall be credited to the legislative deficit control account within the legislative stabilization reserve account. The remainder may be" for "subsection may be."

The 2021 amendment

repealed (b)(ii), which read, "After making transfers to the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction account under
W.S.

9-4-220

.1, on June 30, 2021 for fiscal year 2021 and June 30 of each fiscal year thereafter sixty-five percent (65%) of the funds in excess of the amount calculated under paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be credited to the legislative deficit control account within the legislative stabilization reserve account. The remainder may be expended as appropriated by the legislature."

Laws 2021, ch. 144, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 12, 2021.